District of Columbia statutes.
15-357

Uniformity of interpretation.

This subchapter shall be interpreted and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law of jurisdictions that enact it.

Oct. 2, 1990, D.C. Law 8-173, § 2(b), 37 DCR 5005

History

1981 Ed., § 15-357.

Prior Codifications

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 7 of the Uniform Enforcement of Foreign Judgments Act (1964).

Editor's Notes